California statutes. Public Resources Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92080.

Projects funded pursuant to this chapter shall be consistent with the policies and guidelines established by the California Coastal Commission, the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Ocean Protection Council, the State Lands Commission, the San Francisco Bay Conservation and Development Commission, and the State Coastal Conservancy, if applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Extreme Heat Mitigation [92500. - 92570.]

92500.

The sum of four hundred fifty million dollars ($450,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to respond to severe weather and increasing temperatures, and address extreme heat and extreme heat events in communities. Priority shall be given to projects that provide
 meaningful direct benefits to disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, and vulnerable populations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92510.

Of the funds made available by Section 92500, fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Office of Planning and Research’s Extreme Heat and Community Resilience Program to fund projects that reduce the impact of extreme heat, reduce the urban heat island
 effect, and build community resilience in order to strengthen communities that are vulnerable to the extreme heat impacts of climate change.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92520.

Of the funds made available by Section 92500, one hundred fifty million dollars ($150,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Strategic Growth Council’s
 Transformative Climate Communities Program established pursuant to Section 75240 for projects that provide local economic, environmental, and health benefits, and improve the resilience of priority populations, as defined by the Transformative Climate Communities Program guidelines.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92530.

Of the funds made available by Section 92500, one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Natural Resources Agency for competitive grants for urban greening. These funds shall support projects that mitigate the urban heat island effect, rising temperatures, and extreme heat impacts. Eligible projects may include, but are not limited to,
 the creation and expansion of green streets and alleyways, and investments that support an expanded urban greening program that supports the creation of green recreational parks and green schoolyards in park-poor communities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92540.

Of the funds made available by Section 92500, fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection to protect or augment California’s urban forests pursuant to Section 4799.12. Projects shall contribute to mitigating the urban heat island effect and extreme heat impacts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92550.

(a) Of the funds made available by Section 92500, sixty million dollars ($60,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Office of Emergency Services and the Strategic Growth Council for competitive grants for the creation of strategically located community resilience centers across diverse regions of the state at eligible community facilities. These grants shall be awarded to eligible community facilities that model integrated delivery of emergency response services during disruptions, including zero-emission backup power, drinking water, clean air, cooling, food storage, shelter, telecommunications and broadband services, economic assistance, accommodation of pets, and other health protection measures and emergency resources during a disaster, state of emergency, local
 emergency, or deenergization event. Grants shall be prioritized to proposed centers that demonstrate involvement of community-based organizations and community residents within governance and decisionmaking processes.

(b) The Office of Emergency Services and the Strategic Growth Council shall coordinate with the Department of Food and Agriculture to ensure there is no duplication with funding awarded under Section 92560.

(c) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Deenergization event” means a preventative measure to deenergize all, or a portion, of an electric generation, distribution, or transmission system when the electricity provider reasonably believes there is an imminent and significant risk that strong winds, or other extreme and potentially dangerous weather events, increase the
 probability of a wildfire.

(2) “Eligible community facilities” include, but are not limited to, senior and youth centers, park and recreation sites, libraries, health clinics, hospitals, schools, town halls, food banks, homeless shelters, childcare facilities, community centers, community nonprofit facilities providing essential services, places of worship, mobile sites, and fairgrounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92560.

Of the funds made available by Section 92500, forty million dollars ($40,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Food and Agriculture for grants to fairgrounds operated by the network of California fairs for modifications or upgrades that do one or both of the following activities:

(a) Enhance the ability of those facilities to serve as multirole community, staging, and evacuation centers to provide community resilience benefits during a disaster, state of emergency, local emergency, or deenergization event.

(b) Deploy communications and broadband infrastructure at those facilities to improve their capability to serve as multirole community,
 staging, and evacuation centers and enhance local telecommunications service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

92570.

Projects funded pursuant to this chapter shall be consistent with the policies and guidelines established by the Protecting Californians From Extreme Heat: A State Action Plan to Build Community Resilience, and the Office of Planning and Research’s Extreme Heat and Community Resilience Program, if applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Protect Biodiversity and Accelerating Nature-Based Climate Solutions [93000. - 93060.]

93000.

The sum of one billion two hundred million dollars ($1,200,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the protection of California’s biodiversity and to protect nature and restore landscape health to achieve California’s climate change goals.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

93010.

(a) Of the funds made available by Section 93000, eight hundred seventy million dollars ($870,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Wildlife Conservation Board for grant programs to protect and enhance fish and wildlife
 resources and habitat and achieve the state’s biodiversity, public access, and conservation goals. Eligible programs include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Land acquisition.

(2) Habitat enhancement and restoration.

(3) Rangeland, grazing land, and grassland protection.

(4) Inland wetland conservation.

(5) Ecosystem restoration on agricultural lands.

(6) Climate adaptation and resiliency.

(7) Monarch butterfly and pollinator rescue.

(8) Desert conservation.

(9) Oak woodland conservation.

(10) Purposes of reimbursing the General Fund, pursuant to the Natural Heritage Preservation Tax Credit Act of 2000 (Division 28 (commencing with Section 37000)).

(b) Funding made available pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be used to reduce or offset environmental mitigation or
 compliance obligations otherwise required, but may be used as part of a funding partnership to enhance, expand, or augment conservation efforts required by mitigation. Nothing in this subdivision authorizes the expenditure of bond funds for voluntary agreements as described in Section 80114.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

93020.

(a) Of the funds made available by Section 93000, three hundred twenty million dollars ($320,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to reduce the risks of climate change impacts upon communities, fish and wildlife, and natural
 resources, and increase public access, and shall be allocated in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) Baldwin Hills Conservancy,
 forty-eight million dollars ($48,000,000).

(2) California Tahoe Conservancy, twenty-nine million dollars ($29,000,000).

(3) Coachella Valley Mountains Conservancy,
 eleven million dollars ($11,000,000).

(4) Sacramento-San Joaquin Delta Conservancy,
 twenty-nine million dollars ($29,000,000).

(5) San Diego River Conservancy, forty-eight million dollars ($48,000,000).

(6) San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy,
 forty-eight million dollars ($48,000,000).

(7) San Joaquin River Conservancy, eleven million dollars ($11,000,000).

(8) Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy, forty-eight million dollars ($48,000,000).

(9) Sierra Nevada Conservancy,
 forty-eight million dollars ($48,000,000).

(b) Up to 5 percent of the funds made available pursuant to this section may be allocated for community access projects that benefit disadvantaged communities, severely disadvantaged communities, and vulnerable populations and that include, but are not limited to, the following:

(1) Transportation.

(2) Physical activity programming.

(3) Resource interpretation.

(4) Multilingual translation.

(5) Natural science.

(6) Workforce development and career pathways.

(7) Education.

(8) Communication related to water, parks, climate, coastal protection, and other outdoor pursuits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

93030.

Of the funds made available by Section 93010, one hundred eighty million dollars ($180,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Wildlife Conservation Board for projects to improve habitat connectivity and establish wildlife crossings and corridors, including eighty million dollars ($80,000,000) to establish the San Andreas Corridor Program for the protection and restoration of wildlife corridors along the inner Coast Ranges and the San Andreas Fault.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

93040.

Of the funds made available by Section 93000, ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Natural Resources Agency for the Tribal Nature-Based Solutions Program.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

93050.

Of the funds made available by Section 93010, twenty two million dollars ($22,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation of the Legislature, to the Wildlife Conservation Board for projects for climate change adaptation improvements to protect, conserve, and restore the health and resilience of the southern Ballona Creek Watershed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

93060.

Projects funded pursuant to this chapter shall be consistent with the policies and guidelines established by the Wildlife Conservation Board, the Pathways to 30x30 strategy, the Natural and Working Lands Climate Smart Strategy, California’s 2022 Scoping Plan for Achieving Carbon Neutrality, and the California Climate Adaptation Strategy, if applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Climate Smart, Sustainable, and Resilient Farms, Ranches, and Working Lands [93500. - 93600.]

93500.

The sum of three hundred million dollars ($300,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for improving climate resilience and sustainability of agricultural lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

93510.

Of the funds made available by Section 93500, one hundred five million dollars ($105,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Food and Agriculture’s Office of Environmental Farming and Innovation for improvements in climate resilience of agricultural lands and ecosystem health and allocated to eligible projects as follows:

(a) Sixty-five million dollars
 ($65,000,000) shall be available for grants to promote practices on farms and ranches that improve soil health, or accelerate atmospheric carbon removal or soil carbon sequestration.

(b) Forty million dollars ($40,000,000) shall be available for the State Water Efficiency and Enhancement Program to promote onfarm water use efficiency with a focus on multiple-benefit projects that improve resilience to climate change and save water on California agricultural operations. 

(c) Funds allocated pursuant to this section shall be allocated to projects that provide meaningful and direct benefits to socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

93520.

Of the funds made available by Section 93500, twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall, upon appropriation by the Legislature, be available to the Department of Food and Agriculture for purposes of funding invasive species projects and activities recommended by the Invasive Species Council of California. Preference shall be given to projects that restore and protect biodiversity and ecosystem health. Consideration shall be given to geographic equity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 106, Sec. 16.   (AB 149)   Effective September 17, 2025.   Note: Added by Prop. 4 at the Nov. 5, 2024, election.)
-------------------------------------------

93530.

Of the funds made available by Section 93500, fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Conservation for projects for the protection, restoration, conservation, and enhancement of farmland and rangeland, including, but not limited to, the acquisition of fee title or easements, that improve climate resilience, open-space soil health, atmospheric carbon removal, soil carbon sequestration,
 erosion control, watershed health, water quality, or water retention. Projects shall provide multiple benefits. In awarding funds for farmland and rangeland projects pursuant to this section, the Department of Conservation shall give preference to projects for small- and medium-sized farms.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

93540.

Of the funds made available by Section 93500, ninety million dollars ($90,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Food and Agriculture for grants that benefit small- and medium-sized farms, socially disadvantaged farmers, beginning farmers or ranchers, and veteran farmers or ranchers, and increase the sustainability of agricultural infrastructure and facilities that support food systems, and increase market access.
 Funding made available pursuant to this section shall be allocated as follows:

(a) Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be available for infrastructure related to certified mobile farmers’ markets, including, but not limited to, a mobile farmers’ market vehicle, refrigeration, and other equipment to comply with relevant sections of the Health and Safety Code and related regulations.

(b) Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be available to develop year-round infrastructure for certified farmers’ markets, as defined in Section 47004 of the Food and Agricultural Code, fishermen’s markets, as defined in Section 113780 of the Health and Safety Code, or tribe-operated or native-serving farmers’ markets, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) All-weather infrastructure such as canopies and
 shade structures, tables and seating, market stalls, restrooms and hand wash stations, tent weights and tie-downs, produce washing stations, barricades and bollards for traffic management and pedestrian safety, bicycle parking racks, and other equipment.

(2) Facilities for food preparation, cooking demonstrations, and other nutrition education.

(3) Wireless electronic benefits transfer point-of-sale terminals for market managers and producers to process CalFresh transactions.

(4) Wireless electronic benefits transfer point-of-sale terminals for producers to accept the electronic cash value benefit through the program designed to implement the federal WIC Farmers’ Market Nutrition Act of 1992 (Public Law 102-314) pursuant to Section 123279 of the Health and Safety Code, or equivalent tribal programs.

(5) Other equipment to support the seniors farmers’ market nutrition program, as described in Section 3007 of Title 7 of the United States Code, or equivalent tribal programs.

(c) Twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) shall be available for urban agriculture projects that create or expand city or suburban community farms or gardens, including community food producers, as defined in Section 113752 of the Health and Safety Code, through in-ground small plot cultivation, raised beds, mushroom growing, rooftop farms, and cultivation of vacant lots and in parks.

(d) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be available for grants for regional farm equipment sharing. Preference shall be given to projects and programs that benefit small- and medium-sized farms and socially disadvantaged farmers and ranchers.

(e) Fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be available to advance tribes’ food sovereignty to grow, produce, procure, and distribute foods that reflect Native American culture and traditions and support the development of tribal producers and vendors, including, but not limited to, the following projects:

(1) Irrigation and water infrastructure.

(2) Utility and power infrastructure.

(3) Food processing infrastructure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

93550.

(a) Of the funds made available by Section 93500, thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Conservation, in consultation with the California Agricultural Land Equity Task Force at the Strategic Growth Council, to improve land access and tenure for socially disadvantaged farmers or ranchers, tribal producers, and beginning farmers and ranchers.

(b) The Department of Conservation may make low-interest loans to qualified entities, which shall include land trusts, nonprofit organizations, public agencies, farmer cooperatives, tribal governments, or tribal entities, for the purpose of acquiring agricultural lands to transfer or provide long-term leases to socially disadvantaged farmers or ranchers and beginning farmers and ranchers.

(c) Any agricultural land acquired pursuant to this section shall be required to have an agricultural land conservation easement before being leased or transferred, and the department may require additional appropriate resale restrictions, such as affordability provisions, preemptive purchase right, or shared appreciation consistent with the purposes of this subdivision.

(d) The Department of Conservation shall ensure that the proceeds
 of future resales of land continue to be used for purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

93560.

Of the funds made available by Section 93500, fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the California Vanpool Authority for grants for the deployment of vanpool vehicles, clean technologies, and related facilities, including, but not limited to, charging and alternative fuel infrastructure, for use by low-income agricultural workers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

93570.

Of the funds made available by Section 93500, fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the State Department of Education, in consultation with the Department of Food and Agriculture, for purposes of providing grants to public postsecondary educational institutions that are designated as Agricultural Experiment Stations or Agricultural Research Institutes, to develop research farms to improve climate
 resiliency. Funding provided pursuant to this section shall not exceed one million dollars ($1,000,000) per institution and shall be constructed and maintained with environmentally sustainable infrastructure practices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

93580.

Of the funds made available by Section 93500, ten million dollars ($10,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, as part of the Farmworker Housing Component of the Low-Income Weatherization Program through the Department of Community Services and Development, to low-income farmworker households for no-cost energy efficiency upgrades designed to reduce greenhouse gas emissions by saving energy. These energy efficiency upgrades shall include,
 but are not limited to, insulation, central heating and cooling system upgrades, lighting upgrades, and window replacement.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

93590.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Beginning farmer or rancher” means a farmer or rancher who has not actively operated and managed a farm or ranch with a bona fide insurable interest in a crop or livestock as an owner-operator, landlord, tenant, or sharecropper for more than five crop years, as determined by the United States Secretary of Agriculture and as defined in
 Section 1502 of Title 7 of the United States Code.

(b) “Veteran farmer or rancher” means a farmer or rancher who is all of the following:

(1) Has served in the United States Armed Forces, as defined in Section 101 of Title 38 of the United States Code.

(2) Meets either of the following:

(A) Has not operated a farm or ranch.

(B) Has operated a farm or ranch for not more than five years.

(3) Is a veteran, as defined in Section 101 of Title 38 of the United States Code, who first obtained status as a veteran during the most recent five-year period.

(4) Is a
 beginning veteran farmer or rancher, as that term is used in Section 1502 of Title 7 of the United States Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

93600.

Projects funded pursuant to this chapter shall be consistent with the policies and guidelines established by the Department of Food and Agriculture and the Natural and Working Lands Climate Smart Strategy, if applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Park Creation and Outdoor Access [94000. - 94060.]

94000.

The sum of seven hundred million dollars ($700,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the creation and protection of parks, outdoor access, and educational institutions and facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

94010.

(a) Of the funds made available by Section 94000, two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Parks and Recreation for the creation, expansion, and renovation of safe neighborhood parks in park-poor neighborhoods in accordance with the Statewide Park Development and Community Revitalization Act of 2008’s competitive grant program described in Chapter 3.3 (commencing with Section 5640) of Division 5.

(b) When administering grants pursuant to subdivision (a), priority shall be given to projects that provide multiple benefits, including, but not limited to, mitigating impacts of extreme heat, sea level rise, or flooding, enhancing stormwater capture, improving air
 quality, supporting local biodiversity, and other environmental benefits.

(c) Of the amount available pursuant to subdivision (a), not less than 10 percent shall be available for the rehabilitation, repurposing, or substantial improvement of existing park infrastructure that will lead to increased use and enhanced user experiences or increase access, including, but not limited to, for individuals with disabilities, as defined by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.).

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

94020.

Of the funds made available by Section 94000, two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Natural Resources Agency and its departments, boards, and conservancies for the reduction of climate impacts on disadvantaged communities and vulnerable populations and the creation, protection, and expansion
 of outdoor recreation opportunities. Eligible projects include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(a) Improvements to city parks, county parks, regional parks, and open-space lands to preserve infrastructure, including natural infrastructure, to promote resilience and adaptation or the promotion and enhancement of natural resources and water conservation and efficiencies on local and regional public park lands and open-space lands.

(b) Funding for park-poor communities experiencing a significant loss of parks or open and recreation space resulting from climate-related infrastructure projects.

(c) Multiple-benefit projects that reduce risks of exposure to toxic or hazardous materials that may increase as a result of wildfires, flooding, sea level rise, or reduced water flows to polluted bodies of water.

(d) Improved public access, including for individuals with disabilities, as defined by the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), and outdoor recreation at state parks, city parks, county parks, regional parks, and open-space preserves.

(e) Protection, restoration, and enhancement of the natural resource values of the state park system and projects to expand public access for disadvantaged communities, including, but not limited to, the expansion of lower cost coastal accommodation project development.

(f) Coastal public access infrastructure for disadvantaged communities, including, but not limited to, trails, parking areas, restrooms, bicycle lanes, and transportation improvements, including projects consistent with a public access program pursuant to Section 30610.81.

(g) Projects for the creation and improvement of local parks to correct historic underinvestment in communities identified by the department as park deficient for active recreational infrastructure, including aquatic centers, to encourage youth health, fitness, and recreational
 pursuits.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

94030.

Of the funds made available by Section 94000, one hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Natural Resources Agency and its departments, boards, and conservancies for the protection, restoration, and enhancement of the natural resource values of the state park system and
 for projects to expand recreational opportunities and public access to state and public park nonmotorized trails. Projects may include enhancing and expanding existing trails and creating new trails.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

94040.

Of the funds made available by Section 94000, one hundred seventy-five million dollars ($175,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Department of Parks and Recreation to implement projects to address the department’s backlog of deferred maintenance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

94050.

Of the funds made available by Section 94000, twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the Natural Resources Agency for grants to nature and climate education and research facilities, nonprofit organizations and public institutions, natural history museums, California zoos and aquariums accredited by the Association of Zoos and Aquariums, and geologic heritage sites that serve diverse populations. Grants may be used for buildings, equipment, structures, and exhibit galleries that present collections to promote climate, biodiversity, and cultural literacy. Projects may support species recovery and biodiversity protection in order to advance the state’s 30x30 conservation goal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

94060.

Projects funded pursuant to this chapter shall be consistent with the policies and guidelines established by the Natural Resources Agency, the Outdoors for All strategy, and the Pathways to 30x30 strategy,
 if applicable.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Clean Air [94500. - 94540.]

94500.

The sum of eight hundred fifty million dollars ($850,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for clean energy projects.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

94510.

(a) The proportion of any asset funded pursuant to this section or Section 94520 or 94530 shall be funded without return on equity for the lifetime of the proportion of that asset that would have otherwise been borne by ratepayers.

(b) The proportion of any projects funded pursuant to this section or Section 94520 or 94530 shall be excluded from the ratebase, and no costs may be
 collected from ratepayers.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that bond moneys shall not be used for shareholder incentives or profits for shareholders of private corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

94520.

(a) Of the funds made available by Section 94500, three hundred twenty-five million dollars ($325,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the California Infrastructure and Economic Development Bank, the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission, or any other entity chosen by the Legislature, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the public financing of clean energy transmission projects
 that are necessary to meet the state’s clean energy goals to reduce or offset ratepayer costs associated with the public benefits of transmission projects.

(b) Preference may be given to projects under this section that provide multiple benefits, including, but not limited to, reducing the risk of wildfire, reducing reliance on fossil fuel plants in disadvantaged communities, and reducing rate pressure, including reconductoring and other grid-enhancing technologies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

94530.

Of the funds made available by Section 94500, fifty million dollars ($50,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission for grants or loans to support the Long-Duration Energy Storage Program. Eligible uses may also include zero-emissions distributed energy backup assets, virtual power plants, and demand side grid support.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

94540.

(a) Of the funds made available by Section 94500, four hundred seventy-five million dollars ($475,000,000) shall be available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission to support any of the following activities related to the development of offshore wind generation:

(1) Construction of publicly owned port
 facilities for manufacturing, assembly, staging, and integration of entitlements and components for offshore wind generation.

(2) Expansion and improvement of public port infrastructure to accommodate vessels involved in the installation, maintenance, and operation of offshore wind generation.

(3) Upgrades to port facilities.

(b) The State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission may expend moneys made available pursuant to subdivision (a) consistent with the strategic plan developed pursuant to Section 25991.

(c) The State Energy Resources Conservation and Development Commission shall prioritize projects that can show matching funds or that are located at staging and integration ports that have released a notice of preparation pursuant
 to the California Environmental Quality Act process on or before February 29, 2024.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Fiscal Provisions [95000. - 95015.]

95000.

(a) Bonds in the total amount of ten billion dollars ($10,000,000,000), not including the amount of any refunding bonds issued in accordance with Section 95012, may be issued and sold for carrying out the purposes expressed in this division and to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds, when sold, issued, and delivered, shall be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the
 full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both the principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The Treasurer shall cause the issuance and sell the bonds authorized by the committee pursuant to subdivision (a) in the amount determined by the committee to be necessary or desirable pursuant to Section 95003. The bonds shall be issued and sold upon the terms and conditions specified in a resolution to be adopted by the committee pursuant to Section 16731 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   (SB 867)   Approved in Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, election. Effective November 6, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

95001.

The bonds authorized by this division shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law, and all of the provisions of that law, except subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 16727 of the Government Code, apply to the bonds and to this division and are hereby incorporated in this division as though set forth in full in this division.
